src/foma/olo.lexc
Multichar_Symbols [N] [ADJ] [SG] [PL] [NOM] [GEN] [PRT] [ESS] [TRANS] [IN+ESS] [IN+ABL] [IN+ALL] [AT+ESS] [AT+ABL] [AT+ALL] {p} {ä/i} {s} {ä/öi} {a/i} {k} {v/vv} {k/kk} {p/v/pp} {k/%0} {t/%0} {ä/i} {z/ss} {z/s/ss} {p/pp} {m/mm} {a/oi} {ä/oi} {ö/öi} {k/jj/kk} {l/ll} {k/%0/kk} {e/i} {V} {mm/mp/mpp} {s/tm} {%0/t/tt} {%0/h} {n/m/mm} {%0/z/ss} {%0/z/ks}

! Stems are divided into 13 inflectional classes, mostly reflecting
! different behavior in consonant gradation.
! Special symbols such as {mm/mp/mpp} reflect the three
! grades that are possible for a stem (weak, strong, superstrong)
! These will be rewritten as mm or mp or mpp by the phonological component.

! Special symbols in suffixes that the phonological component handles are inserted now and replaced later.
! V = lengthen previous vowel
! S = strong grade
! SS = superstrong grade 
! R = raise a vowel
! A, O = vowels to be harmonized
! Z = realized as z or s depending on MSD

LEXICON Root

Noun;

LEXICON Noun

!aika[N]:ai{k/jj/kk}{a/oi}      C01;
!daatša[N]:daatš{a/oi}          C01;
!hüvä[ADJ]:hü{v/vv}{ä/i}        C01;
!ikkuna[N]:ikkun{a/oi}          C01;
ikä[N]:i{k}{ä/i}               C01;
!izä[N]:i{z/ss}{ä/öi}           C01;
!jalka[N]:jal{k/%0}{a/oi}       C01;
!kala[N]:ka{l/ll}{a/oi}         C01;
!kukka[N]:ku{k}{a/i}            C01;
!leipä[N]:lei{p/v/pp}{ä/i}      C01;
!lupa[N]:lu{p/v/pp}{a/i}        C01;
!päivä[N]:päiv{ä/i}             C01;
!pökköiheinä[N]:pökköihein{ä/i} C01;
!seppä[N]:se{p/pp}{ä/oi}        C01;
!silmä[N]:sil{m/mm}{ä/i}        C01;

LEXICON C01

!nominative
[NOM][SG]:VRS #;
[NOM][PL]:Vt #;

!genitive
[GEN][SG]:Vn     #;
[GEN][PL]:XXnRSS  #;

!partitive
[PRT][SG]:VVRSS   #;
[PRT][PL]:XXARSS  #;

!illative
[IN+ALL][SG]:VVSS #;
[IN+ALL][PL]:XXRSS #;

!inessive
[IN+ESS][SG]:VVz #;
[IN+ESS][PL]:XXRz #;

!elative
[IN+ABL][SG]:Vst #; !!
[IN+ABL][PL]:XstR #;

!allative
[AT+ALL][SG]:Vlle #;
[AT+ALL][PL]:XlleR #;

!adessive
[AT+ESS][SG]:VVl   #;
[AT+ESS][PL]:XXlR   #; 

!ablative
[AT+ABL][SG]:Vlt  #;
[AT+ABL][PL]:XltR  #;

!translative
[TRANS][SG]:Vks   #;
[TRANS][PL]:XksR   #;

!essive
[ESS][SG]:VVnSS    #;
[ESS][PL]:XXnSSR    #;

! strong grade nom sg, gen pl,
! superstrong: sg: part ill ess
